Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF825.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 HF 825 (2) 91 cm/jh/md H.F. 825 Section 1. Section 428A.1, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. When each deed, instrument, or writing by which any real 3 property in this state is granted, assigned, transferred, or 4 otherwise conveyed is presented for recording to the county 5 recorder, a declaration of value signed by at least one of the 6 sellers or one of the buyers or their agents shall be submitted 7 to the county recorder. However, if the deed, instrument, or 8 writing contains multiple parcels some of which are located in 9 more than one county, separate declarations of value shall be 10 submitted on the parcels located in each county and submitted 11 to the county recorder of that county when paying the tax as 12 provided in section 428A.5 . A declaration of value is not 13 required for those instruments described in section 428A.2, 14 subsections 2 through 5, 7 through 13, and 16 through 21 22 , 15 or described in section 428A.2, subsection 6 , except in the 16 case of a federal agency or instrumentality, or if a transfer 17 is the result of acquisition of lands, whether by contract or 18 condemnation, for public purposes through an exercise of the 19 power of eminent domain. 20 Sec. 2. Section 558.69, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 21 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 22 With each declaration of value submitted to the county 23 recorder under chapter 428A , except for deeds described in 24 section 428A.2, subsection 22, and as specified in subsection 25 8 , there shall be submitted a groundwater hazard statement 26 stating all of the following: 27 -1- HF 825 (2) 91 cm/jh/md 1/ 1